Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2707
Tractor model tests; report; publication;
public record.

The report of the official test required by
section 2-2701 shall be published by the board and made available in the Biological Systems Engineering Department of
the University of Nebraska and in such other places as may be designated by
the board. All information pertaining to the official testing of a tractor
shall be public record and available for inspection during normal business
hours.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 42, p. 1397;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-342;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 7, p. 1488;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 7;

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB907, § 3.